Connecticut, session 2026, HB05088.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to eliminate the
requirement that at least fifty per cent of the assets of a mutual fund
consist of state and municipal government obligations for the fund to be
qualified to pay exempt dividends, for purposes of the personal income
tax.